Nebraska, session 109, LB152.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-3501, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3501 For purposes of sections 77-3501 to 77-3529 and section 4 of
this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in
sections 77-3501.01 to 77-3505.06 shall be used.
Sec. 2. Section 77-3505.06, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3505.06 Occupy means to reside on a property with the intention
of maintaining the property as the owner's primary residence. A departure
from the property for reasons of health or legal duty shall not
disqualify the owner of the property from receiving an exemption under
sections 77-3501 to 77-3529 and section 4 of this act, so long as the
owner demonstrates an intention to return to the property.
Sec. 3. Section 77-3506.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3506.03 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
for homesteads valued at or above the maximum value, the exempt amount
for any exemption under section 77-3507 or 77-3508 shall be reduced by
ten percent for each two thousand five hundred dollars of value by which
the homestead exceeds the maximum value and any homestead which exceeds
the maximum value by twenty thousand dollars or more is not eligible for
any exemption under section 77-3507 or 77-3508.
(2)(a) For homesteads valued at or above the maximum value, the
exempt amount shall not be reduced and the homestead shall remain
eligible for an exemption under section 77-3507 or 77-3508 for the
current year if the homestead:
(i) Received an exemption under section 77-3507 or 77-3508 in the
previous year;
(ii) Was valued below the maximum value in such previous year; and
(iii) Is not ineligible for an exemption under section 77-3507 or
77-3508 for any reason other than as provided in subsection (1) of this
-2-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
section.
(b) If a homestead remains eligible for an exemption under
subdivision (a) of this subsection for any year, the homestead shall
continue to be eligible for each year thereafter unless the homestead is
not eligible for such exemption for any reason other than as provided in
subsection (1) of this section.
(c) The percentage of the exempt amount for a homestead for any year
such homestead is valued at or above the maximum value and remains
eligible for exemption under this subsection shall be equal to the
percentage of the exempt amount for the homestead in the last year the
homestead received an exemption under section 77-3507 or 77-3508 and was
valued below the maximum value.
(d) If the homestead's increase in value from the previous year to a
value at or above the maximum value is due to improvements to the
homestead, this subsection shall not apply to such homestead.
(3) This section shall not apply to any exemption under section
77-3506 and section 4 of this act.
Sec. 4. (1) The Legislature finds and declares that:
(a) Pursuant to Article VIII, section 2, of the Constitution of
Nebraska, the Legislature may exempt from taxation a portion of the value
of any residence actually occupied as a homestead by any classification
of owners;
(b) The existing homestead exemption system should be protected and
expanded; and
(c) Exempting a larger portion of homesteads from taxation will
provide broad-based property tax relief to Nebraska residents.
(2) All homesteads in this state shall be assessed for taxation the
same as other property, except that commencing January 1, 2026, there
shall be exempt from taxation of homesteads the first one hundred
thousand dollars of the actual value of the homestead.
(3) The exemptions in sections 77-3506, 77-3507, and 77-3508 shall
-3-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
be in addition to the exemption described in subsection (2) of this
section.
Sec. 5. Section 77-3509.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-3509.01 If an owner of a homestead applies for an exemption under
section 77-3506, 77-3507, or 77-3508 or section 4 of this act for any
year and such owner subsequently becomes the owner of another homestead
prior to August 15 of such year, the owner may file an application with
the county assessor of the county where the new homestead is located for
a transfer of the exemption to the new homestead. The owner shall file
the application for transfer with the county assessor on or before August
15 of such year or within thirty days after receiving a notice of
rejection on the owner's application for exemption for the original
homestead. The county assessor shall examine each application for
transfer and determine whether or not the new homestead, except for the
January 1 through August 15 ownership and occupancy requirement and the
income requirements, is eligible for exemption under section 77-3506,
77-3507, or 77-3508 or section 4 of this act. If the application for
transfer is approved by the county assessor, he or she shall make a
deduction upon the assessment rolls using the same criteria as previously
applied to the original homestead. The county assessor may allow the
application for transfer to also be considered an application for a
homestead exemption for the subsequent year.
Sec. 6. Section 77-3509.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-3509.03 All property tax statements for homesteads granted an
exemption in sections 77-3506, 77-3507, and 77-3508 and section 4 of this
act shall show the amount of the exemption, the tax that would otherwise
be due, and a statement that the tax loss shall be reimbursed by the
state as a homestead exemption.
Sec. 7. Section 77-3510, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-4-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
amended to read:
77-3510 On or before February 1 of each year, the Tax Commissioner
shall prescribe forms to be used by all claimants for homestead exemption
or for transfer of homestead exemption. Such forms shall contain
provisions for the showing of all information which the Tax Commissioner
may deem necessary to (1) enable the county officials and the Tax
Commissioner to determine whether each claim for exemption under sections
77-3506, 77-3507, and 77-3508 and section 4 of this act should be allowed
and (2) enable the county assessor to determine whether each claim for
transfer of homestead exemption pursuant to section 77-3509.01 should be
allowed. It shall be the duty of the county assessor of each county in
this state to furnish such forms, upon request, to each person desiring
to make application for homestead exemption or for transfer of homestead
exemption. The forms so prescribed shall be used uniformly throughout the
state, and no application for exemption or for transfer of homestead
exemption shall be allowed unless the applicant uses the prescribed form
in making an application. The forms shall require the attachment of an
income statement for any applicant seeking an exemption under section
77-3507 or 77-3508 as prescribed by the Tax Commissioner fully accounting
for all household income. The Tax Commissioner shall provide to each
county assessor claim forms and address lists of applicants from the
prior year in the manner approved by the Tax Commissioner. The
application and information contained on any attachments to the
application shall be confidential and available to tax officials only.
Sec. 8. Section 77-3511, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3511 The application for homestead exemption or for transfer of
homestead exemption shall be signed by the owner of the property who
qualifies for exemption under sections 77-3501 to 77-3529 and section 4
of this act unless the owner is an incompetent or unable to make such
application, in which case it shall be signed by the guardian. If an
-5-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
owner who in all respects qualifies for a homestead exemption under such
sections dies after January 1 and before the last day for filing an
application for a homestead exemption and before applying for a homestead
exemption, his or her personal representative may file the application
for exemption on or before the last day for filing an application for a
homestead exemption of that year if the surviving spouse of such owner
continues to occupy the homestead. Any exemption granted as a result of
such application signed by a personal representative shall be in effect
for only the year in which the owner died.
Sec. 9. Section 77-3512, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3512 (1) It shall be the duty of each owner who wants a homestead
exemption under section 77-3506, 77-3507, or 77-3508 or section 4 of this
act to file an application therefor with the county assessor of the
county in which the homestead is located after February 1 and on or
before June 30 of each year, except that:
(a) The county board of the county in which the homestead is located
may, by majority vote, extend the deadline for an applicant to on or
before July 20. An extension shall not be granted to an applicant who
received an extension in the immediately preceding year;
(b) An owner may file a late application pursuant to section
77-3514.01 if he or she includes documentation of a medical condition
which impaired the owner's ability to file the application in a timely
manner;
(c) An owner may file a late application pursuant to section
77-3514.01 if he or she includes a copy of the death certificate of a
spouse who died during the year for which the exemption is requested;
(d) A veteran qualifying for a homestead exemption under subdivision
(2)(a) of section 77-3506 shall only be required to file an application
in every subsequent year evenly divisible by five; and
(e) If a veteran who has been granted a homestead exemption under
-6-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
subdivision (2)(a) of section 77-3506 dies during the five-year exemption
period, the surviving spouse of such veteran shall continue to receive
such exemption for the remainder of the five-year exemption period. After
the expiration of the five-year exemption period, the surviving spouse
shall be required to file for an exemption under subdivision (2)(b) of
section 77-3506 on an annual basis.
(2) Failure to file an application as required in subsection (1) of
this section shall constitute a waiver of the exemption for the year in
which the failure occurred.
Sec. 10. Section 77-3513, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3513 The county assessor shall mail a notice on or before April 1
to claimants who are the owners of a homestead which was granted an
exemption under section 77-3506, 77-3507, or 77-3508 or section 4 of this
act and who are required to refile for such exemption in the current year
unless the claimant has already filed the application for the current
year or the county assessor has reason to believe there has been a change
of circumstances so that the claimant no longer qualifies. The notice
shall include the claimant's name, the application deadlines for the
current year, a list of documents that must be filed with the
application, and the county assessor's office address and telephone
number.
Sec. 11. Section 77-3514, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-3514 A claimant who is the owner of a homestead which has been
granted an exemption under section 77-3506, 77-3507, or 77-3508 or
section 4 of this act may notify the county assessor by August 15 of each
year of any change in the homestead exemption status occurring in the
preceding portion of the calendar year as a result of a transfer of the
homestead exemption pursuant to sections 77-3509.01 and 77-3509.02. If by
his or her failure to give such notice any property owner permits the
-7-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
allowance of the homestead exemption for any year after the homestead
exemption status of such property has changed, an amount equal to the
amount of the taxes lawfully due but not paid by reason of such unlawful
and improper allowance of homestead exemption, together with penalty and
interest on such total sum as provided by statute on delinquent ad
valorem taxes, shall be due and shall upon entry of the amount thereof on
the books of the county treasurer be a lien on such property while
unpaid. Such lien may be enforced in the manner provided for liens for
other delinquent taxes. Any person who has permitted the improper and
unlawful allowance of such homestead exemption on his or her property
shall, as an additional penalty, also forfeit his or her right to a
homestead exemption on any property in this state for the two succeeding
years.
Sec. 12. Section 77-3516, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-3516 The county assessor shall examine each application for
homestead exemption filed with him or her for an exemption pursuant to
section 77-3506, 77-3507, or 77-3508 or section 4 of this act and shall
determine, except for the income requirements, whether or not such
application should be approved or rejected. If the application is
approved, the county assessor shall mark the same approved and sign the
application. In case he or she finds that the exemption should not be
allowed by reason of not being in conformity to law, the county assessor
shall mark the application rejected, state thereon the reason for such
rejection, and sign the application. In any case when the county assessor
rejects an application for exemption, he or she shall notify the
applicant of such action by mailing written notice to the applicant at
the address shown in the application within ten days after the
application is rejected. The notice shall be on forms prescribed by the
Tax Commissioner.
Sec. 13. Section 77-3517, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-8-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
77-3517 (1) On or before August 1 of each year, the county assessor
shall forward the approved applications for homestead exemptions and a
copy of the certification of disability status that have been examined
pursuant to section 77-3516 to the Tax Commissioner. The Tax Commissioner
shall determine if the applicant meets the income requirements and may
also review any other application information he or she deems necessary
in order to determine whether the application should be approved. The Tax
Commissioner shall, on or before November 1, certify his or her
determinations to the county assessor. If the application is approved,
the county assessor shall make the proper deduction on the assessment
rolls. If the application is denied or approved in part, the Tax
Commissioner shall notify the applicant of the denial or partial approval
by mailing written notice to the applicant at the address shown on the
application. The applicant may appeal the Tax Commissioner's denial or
partial approval pursuant to section 77-3520. Late applications
authorized under section 77-3512 shall be processed in a similar manner
after approval by the county assessor. If the Tax Commissioner approves a
late application after any of the real estate taxes in question become
delinquent, such delinquency and any interest associated with the amount
of the approved exemption shall be removed from the tax rolls of the
county within thirty days after the county assessor receives notice from
the Tax Commissioner of the approved exemption.
(2)(a) Upon his or her own action or upon a request by an applicant,
a spouse, or an owner-occupant, the Tax Commissioner may review any
information necessary to determine whether an application is in
compliance with sections 77-3501 to 77-3529 and section 4 of this act.
Any action taken by the Tax Commissioner pursuant to this subsection
shall be taken within three years after December 31 of the year in which
the exemption was claimed.
(b) If after completion of the review the Tax Commissioner
-9-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
determines that an exemption should have been approved or increased, the
Tax Commissioner shall notify the applicant, spouse, or owner-occupant
and the county treasurer and assessor of his or her determination. The
applicant, spouse, or owner-occupant shall receive a refund of the tax,
if any, that was paid as a result of the exemption being denied, in whole
or in part. The county treasurer shall make the refund and shall amend
the county's claim for reimbursement from the state.
(c) If after completion of the review the Tax Commissioner
determines that an exemption should have been denied or reduced, the Tax
Commissioner shall notify the applicant, spouse, or owner-occupant of
such denial or reduction. The applicant, the spouse, and any owner-
occupant may appeal the Tax Commissioner's denial or reduction pursuant
to section 77-3520. Upon the expiration of the appeal period in section
77-3520, the Tax Commissioner shall notify the county assessor of the
denial or reduction and the county assessor shall remove or reduce the
exemption from the tax rolls of the county. Upon notification by the Tax
Commissioner to the county assessor, the amount of tax due as a result of
the action of the Tax Commissioner shall become a lien on the homestead
until paid. Upon attachment of the lien, the county treasurer shall
refund to the Tax Commissioner the amount of tax equal to the denied or
reduced exemption for deposit into the General Fund. No lien shall be
created if a change in ownership of the homestead or death of the
applicant, the spouse, and all other owner-occupants has occurred prior
to the Tax Commissioner's notice to the county assessor. Beginning thirty
days after the county assessor receives approval from the county board to
remove or reduce the exemption from the tax rolls of the county, interest
at the rate specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time to
time be adjusted by the Legislature, shall begin to accrue on the amount
of tax due.
Sec. 14. Section 77-3521, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-10-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
77-3521 It shall be the duty of the Tax Commissioner to adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations for the information and guidance of the
county assessors and county boards of equalization, not inconsistent with
sections 77-3501 to 77-3529 and section 4 of this act, affecting the
application, hearing, assessment, or equalization of property which is
claimed to be entitled to the exemption granted by such sections.
Sec. 15. Section 77-3522, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3522 (1) Any person who makes any false or fraudulent claim for
exemption or any false statement or false representation of a material
fact in support of such claim or any person who knowingly assists another
in the preparation of any such false or fraudulent claim or enters into
any collusion with another by the execution of a fictitious deed or other
instrument for the purpose of obtaining unlawful exemption under sections
77-3501 to 77-3529 and section 4 of this act shall be guilty of a Class
II misdemeanor and shall be subject to a forfeiture of any such exemption
for a period of two years from the date of conviction. Any person who
shall make an oath or affirmation to any false or fraudulent application
for homestead exemption knowing the same to be false or fraudulent shall
be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(2) In addition to the penalty provided in subsection (1) of this
section, if any person (a) files a claim for exemption as provided in
section 77-3506, 77-3507, or 77-3508 or section 4 of this act which is
excessive due to misstatements by the owner filing such claim or (b)
fails to notify the county assessor of a change in status of a veteran
qualifying for a homestead exemption under subdivision (2)(a) of section
77-3506 which affected all or a portion of the exemption period,
including a change in rating, the death of the veteran, or a transfer of
property not covered by section 77-3514, the claim may be disallowed in
full and, if the claim has been allowed, an amount equal to the amount of
taxes lawfully due during the applicable exemption period but not paid by
-11-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
reason of such unlawful and improper allowance of homestead exemption
shall be due and shall upon entry of the amount thereof on the books of
the county treasurer be a lien on such property until paid and a penalty
and interest on such total sum as provided by statute on delinquent ad
valorem taxes shall be assessed. Any amount paid to satisfy a lien
imposed pursuant to this subsection shall be paid to the county treasurer
in the same manner that other property taxes are paid, and the county
treasurer shall remit such amount to the State Treasurer for credit to
the General Fund. Any penalty collected pursuant to this subsection shall
be retained by the county in which such penalty is assessed.
(3) For any veteran claiming a homestead exemption under subdivision
(2)(a) of section 77-3506, the county assessor may revoke such exemption
back to the date on which the county assessor has reason to believe that
the exemption was improper upon notice to the veteran of the revocation.
The veteran may then provide evidence in favor of receiving the exemption
to the county assessor, and the county assessor may revise any revocation
based on such evidence. Any decision of the county assessor to revoke a
homestead exemption under this subsection may be appealed to the county
board of equalization within thirty days after the decision. The county
board of equalization may reverse or modify the revocation if there is
clear and convincing evidence that the veteran qualified for the
exemption for a particular period of time.
(4) Any additional taxes or penalties imposed pursuant to this
section may be appealed in the same manner as appeals are made under
section 77-3519.
Sec. 16. Section 77-3523, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3523 The county treasurer and county assessor shall, on or before
November 30 of each year, certify to the Tax Commissioner the total tax
revenue that will be lost to all taxing agencies within the county from
taxes levied and assessed in that year because of exemptions allowed
-12-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
under sections 77-3501 to 77-3529 and section 4 of this act. The county
treasurer and county assessor may amend the certification to show any
change or correction in the total tax that will be lost until May 30 of
the next succeeding year. If a homestead exemption is approved, denied,
or corrected by the Tax Commissioner under subsection (2) of section
77-3517 after May 1 of the next year, the county treasurer and county
assessor shall prepare and submit amended reports to the Tax Commissioner
and the political subdivisions covering any affected year and shall
adjust the reimbursement to the county and the other political
subdivisions by adjusting the reimbursement due under this section in
later years. The Tax Commissioner shall, on or before January 1 next
following such certification or within thirty days of any amendment to
the certification, notify the Director of Administrative Services of the
amount so certified to be reimbursed by the state. Reimbursement of the
funds lost shall be made to each county according to the certification
and shall be distributed in six as nearly as possible equal monthly
payments on the last business day of each month beginning in January. The
Director of Administrative Services shall, on the last business day of
each month, issue payments by electronic funds transfer. Out of the
amount so received the county treasurer shall distribute to each of the
taxing agencies within his or her county the full amount so lost by such
agency, except that one percent of such amount shall be deposited in the
county general fund and that the amount due a Class V school district
shall be paid to the district and the county shall be compensated one
percent of such amount. Each taxing agency shall, in preparing its annual
or biennial budget, take into account the amount to be received under
this section.
Sec. 17. Section 77-3529, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3529 If any application for exemption pursuant to sections
77-3501 to 77-3529 and section 4 of this act is denied and the applicant
-13-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
would be qualified for any other exemption under such sections, then such
denied application shall be treated as an application for the highest
exemption for which qualified. Any additional documentation necessary for
such other exemption shall be submitted to the county assessor within a
reasonable time after receipt of the notice of denial.
Sec. 18. Section 77-4212, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4212 (1) For tax year 2007, the amount of relief granted under
the Property Tax Credit Act shall be one hundred five million dollars.
For tax year 2008, the amount of relief granted under the act shall be
one hundred fifteen million dollars. It is the intent of the Legislature
to fund the Property Tax Credit Act for tax years after tax year 2008
using available revenue. For tax year 2017, the amount of relief granted
under the act shall be two hundred twenty-four million dollars. For tax
year 2020 through tax year 2022, the minimum amount of relief granted
under the act shall be two hundred seventy-five million dollars. For tax
year 2023, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be
three hundred sixty million dollars. For tax year 2024, the minimum
amount of relief granted under the act shall be three hundred ninety-five
million dollars. For tax year 2025, the minimum amount of relief granted
under the act shall be four hundred thirty million dollars. For tax year
2026, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be four
hundred forty-five million dollars. For tax year 2027, the minimum amount
of relief granted under the act shall be four hundred sixty million
dollars. For tax year 2028, the minimum amount of relief granted under
the act shall be four hundred seventy-five million dollars. For tax year
2029, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be the
minimum amount from the prior tax year plus a percentage increase equal
to the percentage increase, if any, in the total assessed value of all
real property in the state from the prior year to the current year, as
determined by the Department of Revenue, plus an additional seventy-five
-14-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
million dollars. For tax year 2030 and each tax year thereafter, the
minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be the minimum
amount from the prior tax year plus a percentage increase equal to the
percentage increase, if any, in the total assessed value of all real
property in the state from the prior year to the current year, as
determined by the Department of Revenue. If money is transferred or
credited to the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund pursuant to any other state
law, such amount shall be added to the minimum amount required under this
subsection when determining the total amount of relief granted under the
act. The relief shall be in the form of a property tax credit which
appears on the property tax statement.
(2)(a) For tax years prior to tax year 2017, to determine the amount
of the property tax credit, the county treasurer shall multiply the
amount disbursed to the county under subdivision (4)(a) of this section
by the ratio of the real property valuation of the parcel to the total
real property valuation in the county. The amount determined shall be the
property tax credit for the property.
(b) Beginning with tax year 2017, to determine the amount of the
property tax credit, the county treasurer shall multiply the amount
disbursed to the county under subdivision (4)(b) of this section by the
ratio of the credit allocation valuation of the parcel to the total
credit allocation valuation in the county. The amount determined shall be
the property tax credit for the property.
(3) If the real property owner qualifies for a homestead exemption
under sections 77-3501 to 77-3529 and section 4 of this act, the owner
shall also be qualified for the relief provided in the act to the extent
of any remaining liability after calculation of the relief provided by
the homestead exemption. If the credit results in a property tax
liability on the homestead that is less than zero, the amount of the
credit which cannot be used by the taxpayer shall be returned to the
Property Tax Administrator by July 1 of the year the amount disbursed to
-15-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
the county was disbursed. The Property Tax Administrator shall
immediately credit any funds returned under this subsection to the
Property Tax Credit Cash Fund. Upon the return of any funds under this
subsection, the county treasurer shall electronically file a report with
the Property Tax Administrator, on a form prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner, indicating the amount of funds distributed to each taxing
unit in the county in the year the funds were returned, any collection
fee retained by the county in such year, and the amount of unused credits
returned.
(4)(a) For tax years prior to tax year 2017, the amount disbursed to
each county shall be equal to the amount available for disbursement
determined under subsection (1) of this section multiplied by the ratio
of the real property valuation in the county to the real property
valuation in the state. By September 15, the Property Tax Administrator
shall determine the amount to be disbursed under this subdivision to each
county and certify such amounts to the State Treasurer and to each
county. The disbursements to the counties shall occur in two equal
payments, the first on or before January 31 and the second on or before
April 1. After retaining one percent of the receipts for costs, the
county treasurer shall allocate the remaining receipts to each taxing
unit levying taxes on taxable property in the tax district in which the
real property is located in the same proportion that the levy of such
taxing unit bears to the total levy on taxable property of all the taxing
units in the tax district in which the real property is located.
(b) Beginning with tax year 2017, the amount disbursed to each
county shall be equal to the amount available for disbursement determined
under subsection (1) of this section multiplied by the ratio of the
credit allocation valuation in the county to the credit allocation
valuation in the state. By September 15, the Property Tax Administrator
shall determine the amount to be disbursed under this subdivision to each
county and certify such amounts to the State Treasurer and to each
-16-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
county. The disbursements to the counties shall occur in two equal
payments, the first on or before January 31 and the second on or before
April 1. After retaining one percent of the receipts for costs, the
county treasurer shall allocate the remaining receipts to each taxing
unit based on its share of the credits granted to all taxpayers in the
taxing unit.
(5) For purposes of this section, credit allocation valuation means
the taxable value for all real property except agricultural land and
horticultural land, one hundred twenty percent of taxable value for
agricultural land and horticultural land that is not subject to special
valuation, and one hundred twenty percent of taxable value for
agricultural land and horticultural land that is subject to special
valuation.
(6) The State Treasurer shall transfer from the General Fund to the
Property Tax Credit Cash Fund one hundred five million dollars by August
1, 2007, and one hundred fifteen million dollars by August 1, 2008.
(7) The Legislature shall have the power to transfer funds from the
Property Tax Credit Cash Fund to the General Fund.
Sec. 19. Section 77-7305, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-7305 (1) The School District Property Tax Relief Act shall apply
to tax year 2024 and each tax year thereafter. For tax year 2024, the
total amount of relief granted under the act shall be seven hundred fifty
million dollars. For tax year 2025, the total amount of relief granted
under the act shall be seven hundred eighty million dollars. For tax year
2026, the total amount of relief granted under the act shall be eight
hundred eight million dollars. For tax year 2027, the total amount of
relief granted under the act shall be eight hundred thirty-eight million
dollars. For tax year 2028, the total amount of relief granted under the
act shall be eight hundred seventy million dollars. For tax year 2029,
the total amount of relief granted under the act shall be nine hundred
-17-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
two million dollars. For tax year 2030 and each tax year thereafter, the
total amount of relief granted under the act shall be the total amount of
relief from the prior year increased by three percent. The relief shall
be in the form of property tax credits which appear on property tax
statements. Property tax credits granted under the act shall be credited
against the amount of property taxes owed to school districts.
(2) To determine the amount of the property tax credit for each
parcel, the county treasurer shall multiply the amount disbursed to the
county under subsection (4) of this section by the ratio of the school
district taxes levied in the prior year on the parcel to the school
district taxes levied in the prior year on all real property in the
county. The amount so determined shall be the property tax credit for
that parcel.
(3) If the real property owner qualifies for a homestead exemption
under sections 77-3501 to 77-3529 and section 4 of this act, the owner
shall also be qualified for the property tax credit provided in this
section to the extent of any remaining liability after calculation of the
homestead exemption. If the property tax credit provided in this section
results in a property tax liability on the homestead that is less than
zero, the amount of the credit which cannot be used by the taxpayer shall
be returned to the Property Tax Administrator by July 1 of the year the
amount disbursed to the county was disbursed. The Property Tax
Administrator shall immediately credit any funds returned under this
subsection to the School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund. Upon
the return of any funds under this subsection, the county treasurer shall
electronically file a report with the Property Tax Administrator, on a
form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, indicating the amount of funds
distributed to each school district in the county in the year the funds
were returned and the amount of unused credits returned.
(4) The amount disbursed to each county under this section shall be
equal to the amount available for disbursement under subsection (1) of
-18-

LB152 LB152
2025 2025
this section multiplied by the ratio of the school district taxes levied
in the prior year on all real property in the county to the school
district taxes levied in the prior year on all real property in the
state. By September 15, 2024, and by September 15 of each year
thereafter, the Property Tax Administrator shall determine the amount to
be disbursed under this subsection to each county and shall certify such
amounts to the State Treasurer and to each county. The disbursements to
the counties shall occur in two equal payments, the first on or before
January 31 and the second on or before April 1.
(5) The county treasurer shall disburse amounts received under
subsection (4) of this section, which are credited against the amount of
property taxes owed to school districts, in the same manner as if such
funds had been received in the form of property tax payments for property
taxes owed to school districts, meaning any amounts attributable to
divided taxes pursuant to section 18-2147 of the Community Development
Law shall be remitted to the applicable authority for which such taxes
were divided.
(6) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund shall be
used for purposes of making the disbursements to counties required under
subsection (4) of this section.
Sec. 20. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 21. Original sections 77-3509.01, 77-3509.03, 77-3510,
77-3514, and 77-3516, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections
77-3501, 77-3505.06, 77-3506.03, 77-3511, 77-3512, 77-3513, 77-3517,
77-3521, 77-3522, 77-3523, 77-3529, 77-4212, and 77-7305, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-19-